cs: Velikost rukavice: Dvojité extra velké (XXL); Extra velké (XL); Extra malé (XS); Velké (L); Střední (M); Malé (S); Dětské velké; Dětské střední; Dětské malé; Ostatní
ja: グローブのサイズ: ダブルエクストララージ (XXL); エクストララージ (XL); エクストラスモール (XS); ラージ (L); ミディアム (M); スモール (S); ユースラージ; ユースミディアム; ユーススモール; その他
da: Handskestørrelse: Dobbelt ekstra large (XXL); Ekstra large (XL); Ekstra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Junior large; Junior medium; Junior small; Anden
fr: Taille du gant: Très très grand (XXL); Très grand (XL); Très petit (XS); Grand (L); Moyen (M); Petit (S); Grand (junior); Moyen (junior); Petit (junior); Autre
de: Handschuhgröße: Doppel-Extra-Large (XXL); Extra-Large (XL); Extra-Small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Jugendgröße Large; Jugendgröße Medium; Jugendgröße Small; Andere
hu: Kesztyűméret: Dupla extra nagy (XXL); Extra nagy (XL); Extra kicsi (XS); Nagy (L); Közepes (M); Kicsi (S); Ifjúsági nagy; Ifjúsági közepes; Ifjúsági kicsi; Egyéb
ko: 장갑 사이즈: 더블 엑스라지(XXL); 엑스라지(XL); 엑스스몰(XS); 라지(L); 미디엄(M); 스몰(S); 유스 라지; 유스 미디엄; 유스 스몰; 기타
ro-RO: Dimensiunea mănușii: Dublu extra mare (XXL); Extra mare (XL); Extra mic (XS); Mare (L); Mediu (M); Mic (S); Copii - Mare; Copii - Mediu; Copii - Mic; Altele
sv: Handskar – storlek: Dubbel extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Junior large; Junior medium; Junior small; Annan
tr: Eldiven bedeni: Çift ekstra büyük (XXL); Ekstra büyük (XL); Ekstra küçük (XS); Büyük (L); Orta (M); Küçük (S); Genç büyük; Genç orta; Genç küçük; Diğer
sk-SK: Veľkosť rukavice: Dvojité extra veľké (XXL); Extra veľké (XL); Extra malé (XS); Veľké (L); Stredné (M); Malé (S); Mládežnícke veľké; Mládežnícke stredné; Mládežnícke malé; Iné
bg-BG: Размер на ръкавицата: Двойно много голям (XXL); Много голям (XL); Много малък (XS); Голям (L); Среден (M); Малък (S); Младежки голям; Младежки (M); Младежки (S); Друго
pl: Rozmiar rękawic: Podwójny bardzo duży (XXL); Bardzo duży (XL); Bardzo mały (XS); Duży (L); Średni (M); Mały (S); Młodzieżowy duży; Młodzieżowy średni; Młodzieżowy mały; Inny
el: Μέγεθος γαντιού: Διπλό extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Εφηβικό large; Εφηβικό medium; Εφηβικό small; Άλλο
hr-HR: Veličina rukavice: Dvostruko iznimno veliko (XXL); Iznimno veliko (XL); Iznimno malo (XS); Veliko (L); Srednje (M); Malo (S); Za mlade – veliko; Za mlade – srednje; Za mlade – malo; Ostalo
en: Glove size: Double extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Youth large; Youth medium; Youth small; Other
fi: Käsineen koko: Kaksinkertainen erikoissuuri (XXL); Erikoissuuri (XL); Erikoispieni (XS); Suuri (L); Keskikoko (M); Pieni (S); Nuorten suuri; Nuorten keskikoko; Nuorten pieni; Muu
nb: Hanskestørrelse: Dobbel ekstra stor (XXL); Ekstra stor (XL); Ekstra liten (XS); Stor (L); Medium (M); Liten (S); Ungdom stor; Ungdom medium; Ungdom liten; Annet
pt-BR: Tamanho da luva: Extra extra grande (XXL); Extra grande (XL); Extra pequeno (XS); Grande (L); Médio (M); Pequeno (S); Juvenil grande; Juvenil médio; Juvenil pequeno; Outro
nl: Handschoen maat: Extra extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Jeugd large; Jeugd medium; Jeugd small; Anders
th: ขนาดถุงมือ: XXL (ใหญ่พิเศษ 2 เท่า); XL (ใหญ่พิเศษ); XS (เล็กพิเศษ); L (ใหญ่); M (กลาง); S (เล็ก); ใหญ่สำหรับเยาวชน; กลางสำหรับเยาวชน; เล็กสำหรับเยาวชน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 手套尺码: 双加大码 (XXL); 加大码 (XL); 加小码 (XS); 大码 (L); 中码 (M); 小码 (S); 青年大码; 青年中码; 青年小码; 其他
vi: Kích cỡ găng tay: Rất rất lớn (XXL); Rất lớn (XL); Rất nhỏ (XS); Lớn (L); Vừa (M); Nhỏ (S); Thiếu niên lớn; Thiếu niên vừa; Thiếu niên nhỏ; Khác
ru: Размер перчатки: Двойной очень большой (XXL); Очень большой (XL); Очень маленький (XS); Большой (L); Средний (M); Маленький (S); Подростковый большой; Подростковый средний; Подростковый маленький; Другое
it: Taglia dei guanti: Doppia extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Large bambino; Medium bambino; Small bambino; Altro
es: Talla del guante: Extra extra grande (XXL); Extra grande (XL); Extra pequeño (XS); Grande (L); Mediano (M); Pequeño (S); Juvenil grande; Juvenil mediano; Juvenil pequeño; Otro
sl-SI: Velikost rokavice: Dvojna zelo velika (XXL); Zelo velika (XL); Zelo majhna (XS); Velika (L); Srednja (M); Majhna (S); Velika (mladinska); Srednja (mladinska); Majhna (mladinska); Drugo
lt-LT: Pirštinių dydis: Dvigubas ypač didelis (XXL); Ypač didelis (XL); Ypač mažas (XS); Didelis (L); Vidutinis (M); Mažas (S); Didelis (jaunuolių); Vidutinis (jaunuolių); Mažas (jaunuolių); Kita
pt-PT: Luva: Duplo extragrande (XXL); Extragrande (XL); Extrapequeno (XS); Grande (L); Médio (M); Pequeno (S); Juvenil grande; Juvenil médio; Juvenil pequeno; Outro
zh-TW: 手套尺寸: 雙加大 (XXL); 加大 (XL); 加小 (XS); 大 (L); 中 (M); 小 (S); 青少年大號; 青少年中號; 青少年小號; 其他